Utah statutes.
78B-2-106.   Effect of death of defendant outside this state.

If a person against whom a cause of action exists dies outside the state, the time which elapses between his death and the expiration of one year after this state issues letters testamentary or letters of administration is not a part of the time limited for the commencement of an action against his executor or administrator.

